California statutes. Education Code
All money expended under the authority of any such certificate for clothing and transportation, necessary dental work, eye care, operations, and hospitalization, and all money expended by the Department of Education for expenses incurred by it in providing dental work, eye care, operations, or hospitalization for the child in an emergency for which the Department of Education cannot be reimbursed by the parent or guardian of the child as shown by the certificate, constitutes a legal charge against the county from which the certificate is issued. Expenditures for clothing and transportation shall not exceed the sum of three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385) for the 1974–75 school year, and an amount thereafter which shall be adjusted annually in conformance with the Consumer Price Index, all items, of the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, measured for the calendar year next preceding the fiscal year to which it applies. The State Controller shall determine the amount authorized pursuant to this section for the 1975–76 school year and thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59027.

The certificate shall be presented to the superintendent of the school. When the certificate shows that the parent or guardian of the child is unable either himself or from the estate of the child to clothe the child, or pay for his transportation to and from school, or for necessary dental work, eye care, operations, and hospitalization of the child while in school, the superintendent shall clothe the child and provide the transportation, necessary dental work, eye care, operations, and hospitalization. The expense of the services, or any of them, shall be advanced by the Department of Education out of money appropriated for the support of the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59028.

Upon presentation to the county in which the certificate is issued, of an itemized claim, duly sworn to by the superintendent of the school before an officer authorized to administer oaths, for the expense for clothing, transportation, and other items provided and furnished under the authority of the certificate, or for the reimbursement of the Department of Education, the claim shall be processed and paid pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 29700) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code. The amount paid and all reimbursements of the Department of Education under this section shall be credited to the current appropriation for the support and maintenance of the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59029.

All pupils in the school shall be maintained at the expense of the state, except as provided in Sections 59021, 59023 to 59028, inclusive, 59030, and 59031.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59030.

The governing board of each school district of residence shall, from the general fund of the school district, pay for the transportation cost of each pupil of the district in attendance at the California School for the Deaf as a day-class pupil.

For determining the school district responsible under the provisions of this section for making the payment when the pupils reside in other than a unified school district, pupils 15 years of age or older as of September 1 of each fiscal year shall be considered residents of the high school district, and pupils 14 years of age or under as of September 1 shall be considered residents of the elementary district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59030.5.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to the California Schools for the Deaf, an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-nine dollars ($389) per fiscal year per unit of average daily attendance of each deaf pupil attending one of the schools as a five-day residential pupil for the purpose of providing transportation to and from the pupil’s home on weekends and school holiday periods. In no case shall the total apportionment made to the schools exceed the actual total transportation expenditures of the schools.

The administrators of such schools shall arrange for transportation of such pupils utilizing the most practical means including, but not limited to, commercial bus, rail, or air, charter bus or private passenger vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

59031.

Deaf persons not residents of this state may be admitted to the benefits of the school upon paying to the Department of Education the school year cost for the maintenance, care, and instruction of persons at the school, payable quarterly in advance. The cost of the care, maintenance, and instruction shall be determined by the Department of Education with the approval of the Department of Finance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Services [59040. - 59045.]

59040.

The Department of Education, in connection with the California School for the Deaf, may establish and maintain a preschool and kindergarten service for the care and teaching of children under school age. The department shall prescribe the rules and regulations which shall govern the conduct of the preschool and kindergarten service, appoint such teachers as it determines necessary, and fix their salaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59041.

The Department of Education, in connection with the California School for the Deaf, may offer courses of instruction to parents of a deaf child to assist and instruct the parents in the early care and training of such child, to train the child in play, and to do everything which will assure the child’s physical, mental and social adjustment to its environment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59042.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may authorize the California School for the Deaf to establish and maintain a testing center for deaf and hard-of-hearing minors. It shall be the purpose of this center to test hearing acuity and to give such other tests as may be necessary for advising parents and school authorities concerning an appropriate educational program for the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59043.

Nothing in this article and no rule or regulation established thereunder shall authorize the compulsory physical examination or medical treatment of any child or minor if the parent or guardian objects on the ground that such examination or treatment is contrary to the religious beliefs of such parent or guardian.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59044.

The Department of Education, in connection with the California School for the Deaf which maintains automobile driver training courses, may purchase from available funds public liability, property damage, collision, fire, theft, and comprehensive automobile insurance for motor vehicles, whether owned by private parties or such school for the deaf, used in connection with such courses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59045.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in conjunction with the California Schools for the Deaf, shall provide assessment and instructional planning services for individuals who are referred for those services pursuant to Section 56326.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 52.7.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Employment Qualifications [59050. - 59054.]

59050.

Notwithstanding Sections 59051, 59052, 59053, and 59054, the California School for the Deaf may not use the American Sign Language Proficiency Interview (ASLPI) or an alternative test selected by the American Sign Language Competency Evaluation Committee of the California School for the Deaf for the purposes specified in this article unless it is first determined that the test is a valid and reliable test for employment purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 865, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

59051.

During the 2004–05, 2005–06, and 2006–07 school years, for purposes of hiring a certificated individual to instruct deaf pupils, preference shall first be given to a candidate who achieves a minimum score of 4 on the American Sign Language Proficiency Interview (ASLPI) or an equivalent score on an alternate test selected by the American Sign Language Competency Evaluation Committee of the California School for the Deaf that assesses American Sign Language linguistic competency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 865, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

59052.

(a) Commencing with the 2004-05 school year, an individual may not be hired as a certificated employee to instruct deaf pupils unless the individual achieves a minimum score of 2.5 on the American Sign Language Proficiency Interview (ASLPI) or an equivalent score on an alternate test selected by the American Sign Language Competency Evaluation Committee of the California School for the Deaf that assesses American Sign Language linguistic competency.

(b) Commencing with the 2005-06 school year, an individual may not be hired as a certificated employee to instruct deaf pupils unless the individual achieves a minimum score of 3 on the ASLPI or an equivalent score on an alternate test, as described in subdivision (a).

(c) Commencing with the 2006-07 school year, an individual may not be hired as a certificated employee to instruct deaf pupils unless the individual achieves a minimum score of 3.5 on the ASLPI or an equivalent score on an alternate test, as described in subdivision (a).

(d) The minimum score requirements specified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, may be waived by the superintendent of the school if he or she certifies that no candidate who meets those requirements and all other selection criteria has applied to instruct deaf pupils and open positions remain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

59053.

(a) Commencing with the 2004–05 school year, and every three years thereafter, a certificated employee who instructs deaf pupils and who has not achieved a minimum score of 4 on the American Sign Language Proficiency Interview (ASLPI) or an equivalent score on an alternate test selected by the American Sign Language Competency Evaluation Committee of the California School for the Deaf that assesses American Sign Language linguistic competency, shall retake one of those assessments.

(b) A certificated employee who instructs deaf pupils and who does not achieve a minimum score of 4 on the ASLPI or an equivalent score on an alternate test, as described in subdivision (a), may not be subject to discipline. The certificated employee shall be encouraged to study until that score is achieved.

(c) Any fee imposed to take the ASLPI or an alternate test, as described in subdivision (a), shall be paid by the certificated employee. If the certificated employee receives a minimum score of 4 on the ASLPI or an equivalent score on the alternate test, the California School for the Deaf shall reimburse the certificated employee for that fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 865, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

59054.

(a) For purposes of hiring an individual to serve as a substitute teacher, preference shall be given as follows:

(1) First, to a candidate who achieves a minimum score of 4 on the American Sign Language Proficiency Interview (ASLPI) or an equivalent score on an alternate test selected by the American Sign Language Competency Evaluation Committee of the California School for the Deaf that assesses American Sign Language linguistic competency.

(2) Second, to a candidate who achieves a minimum score of 3 on the ASLPI or an equivalent score on an alternate test, as described in paragraph (1).

(3) Third, to a candidate who achieves a minimum score of 2.5 on the ASLPI or an equivalent score on an alternate test, as described in paragraph (1).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a candidate who fails to achieve a score of at least 2.5 on the ASLPI or who fails to achieve an equivalent score on an alternate test, as described in paragraph (1), may not be hired as a substitute teacher.

(c) The superintendent of the school may waive the requirements of subdivision (b) if no candidate for the substitute teacher position has achieved the minimum score required by subdivision (b) and there is an immediate need to fill an open position.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 865, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. California School for the Blind [59100. - 59144.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [59100. - 59105.]

59100.

There is one state school for the blind, known and designated as the California School for the Blind.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59101.

The California School for the Blind is a part of the public school system of the state except that it derives no revenue from the State School Fund, and has for its object the education of visually impaired, blind, and deaf-blind pupils who, because of their severe sensory loss and educational needs, cannot be provided an appropriate educational program and related services in the regular public schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 53.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59102.

The California School for the Blind is under the administration of the State Department of Education.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in connection with the California School for the Blind, shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide educational assessments and individual educational recommendations for individuals referred for those services pursuant to Section 56326.

(b) Maintain a comprehensive elementary and secondary educational program, including related services and nonacademic and extracurricular activities for visually impaired, blind, and deaf-blind individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 54.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59102.5.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in connection with the California School for the Blind and in cooperation with public and private agencies, may:

(a) Serve as a demonstration school to promote personnel development through student teaching, in-service education, internships, and professional observations for special education and related services personnel, in cooperation with institutions of higher education and local education agencies.

(b) Serve as a resource center to develop and disseminate special curriculum, media, teaching methods and instructional materials adapted for visually impaired, blind, and deaf-blind individuals, achievement tests, and other assessment methods useful to the instruction of visually impaired, blind, and deaf-blind individuals.

(c) Provide counseling and information services to parents, guardians, and families of visually impaired, blind, or deaf-blind individuals, and public information about sensory losses to community groups and other agencies.

(d) Conduct experimental programs and projects to promote improvement in special education for visually impaired, blind, and deaf-blind individuals.

(e) Promote community and continuing education opportunities for visually impaired, blind, and deaf-blind individuals utilizing existing community resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 55.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59103.

The Department of Education in relation to the California School for the Blind shall:

(a) Prescribe rules for the government of the school.

(b) Appoint the superintendent and other officers and employees.

(c) Remove for cause any officer, teacher, or employee.

(d) Fix the compensation of officers, teachers, and employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59104.

(a) The Department of Human Resources shall consider making salaries for teachers, specialists, and administrators of the California School for the Blind competitive with the salaries of similarly qualified school teachers, specialists, and administrators who are employed by the encompassing school districts.

(b) For purposes of this section, “teachers,” “teacher specialists,” and “administrators” mean those individuals who hold the appropriate teaching, service, or teaching and administrative credential, as appropriate, as issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, as determined by the employing state agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 11.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

59105.

(a) The department may require employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors for the California School for the Blind, as defined in Section 59100, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The department shall electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 24.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Teaching Force [59110. - 59113.]

59110.

The superintendent of the school shall have had not less than three years’ experience in the art of teaching the blind and shall hold a credential issued by the State Board of Education authorizing him to teach in secondary schools of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59111.

The powers and duties of the superintendent of the school are such as are assigned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 56.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59112.

There is hereby created at the California School for the Blind the position of field worker to be appointed by the superintendent of the school with the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The field worker shall be a member of the teaching staff of the California School for the Blind and shall receive a salary fixed and payable in accordance with law.

The fieldworker shall visit graduates and former pupils of the school in their homes to advise them regarding the extension and continuance of their education, to assist them in securing remunerative employment, to improve their economic condition in all possible ways,
 and to provide them with preparatory instruction found necessary for a selected occupation. The fieldworker shall be a person who has had special training for such work. Blindness shall not be grounds to disqualify a person for this position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59113.

The Department of Education may employ any person, otherwise qualified, who has retired for service under either the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Teachers’ Retirement System as a substitute in a position requiring certification qualifications at the California School for the Blind; provided, that the total of such service and any service rendered pursuant to Section 23919 shall not exceed 90 teaching days in any one fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Pupils [59120. - 59131.]

59120.

Every blind person resident of this state, of suitable age and capacity, is entitled to an education in the California School for the Blind free of charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59123.

All pupils in the school shall be maintained at the expense of the state, except as provided in Sections 59121, 59124 to 59128, inclusive, and 59131.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59124.

The governing board of each school district of residence shall, from the general fund of the school district, pay for the transportation cost of each pupil of the district in attendance at the California School for the Blind as a day-class pupil.

For determining the school district responsible under the provisions of this section for making the payment when the pupils reside in other than a unified school district, pupils 15 years of age or older as of September 1 of each fiscal year shall be considered residents of the high school district, and pupils 14 years of age or under as of September 1 shall be considered residents of the
 elementary district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59124.5.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to the California School for the Blind, an amount not to exceed three hundred eighty-nine dollars ($389) per fiscal year per unit of average daily attendance of each blind pupil attending the school as a five-day residential pupil for the purpose of providing transportation to and from the pupil’s home on weekends and school holiday periods. In no case shall the total apportionment made to the school exceed the actual total transportation expenditures of the school.

The administrators of such schools shall arrange for transportation of such pupils utilizing the most practical means
 including, but not limited to, commercial bus, rail, or air, charter bus or private passenger vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1249.)
-------------------------------------------

59125.

If the parent or guardian of any pupil in the school is unable either himself or from the estate of the child to clothe the child, or pay for its transportation to and from school, or for necessary dental work, eye care, operations, and hospitalization of the child while at the school, or is unable either himself or from the estate of the child to reimburse the Department of Education for expenses incurred by it in providing dental work, eye care, operations, or hospitalization for the child in an emergency, the parent or guardian may apply for a certificate to that effect to the superior court of the county of which the parent or guardian of the child is resident. If the
 court is satisfied that the parent or guardian either himself or from the estate of the child is unable to pay for any such service, it shall issue a certificate to that effect. The application for the certificate may also be made to the court by the superintendent of the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59126.

The certificate shall be presented to the superintendent of the school and the superintendent when the certificate shows the parent or guardian of the child is unable either himself or from the estate of the child to clothe the child, or pay for his transportation to and from school, or for necessary dental work, eye care, operations, and hospitalization of the child while in school, shall clothe the child and provide the transportation, dental work, eye care, operations, and hospitalization. The expense of the services, or any of them, shall be advanced by the Department of Education out of money appropriated for the support of the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59127.

All money expended under the authority of any such certificate for clothing and transportation, necessary dental work, eye care, operations and hospitalization, and all money expended by the Department of Education for expenses incurred by it in providing dental work, eye care, operations, or hospitalization for the child in an emergency for which the Department of Education cannot be reimbursed by the parent or guardian of the child as shown by the certificate, constitutes a legal charge against the county from which the certificate is issued. Expenditures for clothing and transportation shall not exceed the sum of three hundred eighty-five dollars ($385) for the 1974–75
 school year, and an amount thereafter which shall be adjusted annually in conformance with the Consumer Price Index, all items, of the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, measured for the calendar year next preceding the fiscal year to which it applies. The State Controller shall determine the amount authorized pursuant to this section for the 1975–76 school year and thereafter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59128.

Upon presentation to the county in which the certificate is issued, of an itemized claim, duly sworn to by the superintendent of the school before an officer authorized to administer oaths, for the expense for clothing, transportation, and other items provided and furnished under the authority of the certificate, or for the reimbursement of the Department of Education, the claim shall be processed and paid pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 29700) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code. The amount paid and all reimbursements of the Department of Education under this section shall be credited to the current appropriation for the support
 and maintenance of the school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59129.

If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the parent or guardian has sufficient pecuniary ability or that there are sufficient funds in the estate of the child to provide the service for the child or to reimburse the Department of Education for expenses incurred by it on providing the service for the child in an emergency, the court shall not issue the certification, but shall according to the nature of the application before it, either order the superintendent to provide the child with the service, or order the parent or guardian either himself or from the estate of the child, as the court determines, to reimburse the Department of Education for expenses incurred
 by it in providing the service for the child in an emergency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59130.

If the Department of Education is not reimbursed by the parent or guardian personally or from the estate of the child for expenditures made by the superintendent under the order of the court or if the parent or guardian does not comply with an order of the court to reimburse the Department of Education either personally or from the estate of the child for expenses incurred by it in providing the service for the child in an emergency the superintendent may sue the parent or guardian, in the name of the state, to recover any money paid out by order of the court or due the Department of Education as reimbursement under an order of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59131.

Blind persons not residents of this state may be admitted to the benefits of the school upon paying to the Department of Education the sum of the school year cost for the maintenance, care, and instruction of persons at the school, payable quarterly in advance. The cost of the care, maintenance, and instruction shall be determined by the Department of Education with the approval of the Department of Finance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Services and Courses [59140. - 59144.]

59140.

The Department of Education, in connection with the California School for the Blind, shall establish and maintain a kindergarten service for the care and teaching of children under school age. The department shall prescribe the rules and regulations which shall govern the conduct of the kindergarten service, appoint such teachers as it determines necessary, and fix their salaries.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59141.

The Department of Education shall create the position of visiting teacher to blind children of preschool age. With the consent of the parents of any blind child of preschool age it shall be the duties of such visiting teacher to assist and instruct the parents in the early care and training of said child, to train the child in play, and to do everything which will assure the child’s physical, mental and social adjustment to its environment. The Department of Education shall maintain a sufficient number of visiting teachers to adequately serve the needs of parents of preschool blind children in accordance with the known number of such children. In any event the caseload of each visiting teacher shall not exceed a number of clients that can be adequately and fully served.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59142.

The Department of Education, in addition to the teaching and education of the blind of suitable age, shall adopt measures and prescribe rules for the giving of vocational training to the pupils at the school, in order that they may be equipped upon their graduation to engage in occupations or industries by which they may become self-supporting. The board shall determine the nature and scope of the vocational training, with the view of best adapting the blind to follow useful and productive pursuits, after the completion of their education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

59143.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may authorize the California School for the Blind to establish and maintain, either independently or in cooperation with the University of California or the Trustees of the California State University, teacher training courses for teachers of the blind. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish standards for the admission of persons to the courses, and for the content of the courses.

The California School for the Blind may enter into one or more agreements with the Trustees of the California State University, the University of California, or any other university or college accredited by the State Board of Education as a teacher training educational institution, to provide practice teaching required for issuance of the credentials authorizing the holder to teach visually impaired, blind, or deaf-blind individuals, or provide orientation and mobility instruction. The agreement or agreements may provide for a reasonable payment, for services rendered, to teachers of the California School for the Blind who have practice teachers under their direction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 33.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

59144.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in conjunction with the California School for the Blind, shall provide assessment and instructional planning services for individuals who are referred for those services pursuant to Section 56326.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 58.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Tuberculosis Testing in Special Schools [59150. - 59150.]

59150.

Students attending the California School for the Deaf, Northern California, California School for the Deaf, Southern California, and California School for the Blind shall be tested for exposure to tuberculosis at least once every two years. The results of these tests shall be provided to the director of the appropriate special school. The parent or guardian of the student shall be responsible for the cost, if any, of the test.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 2.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Diagnostic Centers [59200. - 59220.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [59200. - 59206.]

59200.

There are three diagnostic centers, to be known and designated as Diagnostic Center, Northern California, Diagnostic Center, Central California, and Diagnostic Center, Southern California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 60.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59201.

The diagnostic centers are a part of the public school system of the state, except that they derive no revenue from the State School Fund. The diagnostic centers provide services, including pupil assessment, consultation, technical assistance, and training, to school districts, county offices of education, and special education local plan areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 60.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

59202.

The centers are under the administration of the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 62.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

59203.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in relation to the diagnostic centers, shall do all of the following:

(a) Prescribe rules for the government of the centers.

(b) Appoint the directors of the centers and other officers and employees.

(c) Remove for cause any officer, teacher, or employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 61.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

59204.5.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in connection with the diagnostic centers and in cooperation with public and private agencies, may:

(a) Conduct projects designed to meet needs of those categories of disabled children selected by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(b) Serve as a demonstration program to promote personnel development through in-service education, internships, and professional observations for education personnel, in cooperation with institutions of higher education and local education agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 63.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

59205.

(a) The Department of Human Resources shall consider making salaries for teachers, specialists, and administrators of the Diagnostic Center, Southern California, the Diagnostic Center, Central California, and the Diagnostic Center, Northern California, competitive with the salaries of similarly qualified school teachers, specialists, and administrators who are employed by the encompassing school districts.

(b) For purposes of this section, “teachers,” “teacher specialists,” and “administrators” mean those individuals who hold the appropriate teaching, service, or teaching and administrative credential, as appropriate, as issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, as determined by the employing state
 agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 12.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

59206.

(a) The department may require employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors for the diagnostic centers, as defined in Section 59200, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The department shall electronically submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state-and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 25.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Teaching Force [59210. - 59210.]

59210.

The powers and duties of the directors of the diagnostic centers are such as are assigned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 64.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Pupils [59220. - 59220.]

59220.

Pupils residing within California shall be accepted by a diagnostic center pursuant to criteria adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 67.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Finance [59300. - 59300.]



  ARTICLE 1. Local Contribution [59300. - 59300.]

59300.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the district of residence of the parent or guardian of any pupil attending a state-operated school pursuant to this part, excluding day pupils, shall pay the school of attendance for each pupil an amount equal to 10 percent of the excess annual cost of education of pupils attending a state-operated school pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1093, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 33. INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS AND TESTING [60000. - 60910.]



  CHAPTER 1. Instructional Materials [60000. - 60152.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent [60000. - 60005.]

60000.

(a) It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature in enacting this part to provide for the adoption and selection of quality instructional materials for use in the elementary and secondary schools.

(b) The Legislature hereby recognizes that, because of the common needs and interests of the citizens of this state and the nation, there is a need to establish broad minimum standards and general educational guidelines for the selection of instructional materials for the public schools, but that because of economic, geographic, physical, political, educational, and social diversity, specific choices about instructional materials need to be made at the local level.

(c) The Legislature further recognizes that the governing boards of school districts have the responsibility to establish courses of study and that they must have the ability to choose instructional materials that are appropriate to their courses of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60001.

For the purposes of any provision of the California Constitution that requires the adoption of textbooks for use in the elementary schools, the state board shall adopt at least five separate basic instructional materials for each grade level and each subject area as required by Section 60200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 413, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60002.
